Hawaii, session 2026, GM1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that in Barker v. Young,
153 Hawaii 144 (2023), the Hawaii supreme court clarified that a
person who is arrested for or charged with a crime as a felony,
misdemeanor, or petty misdemeanor, but is later convicted of a
violation for that incident, is eligible for an expungement of
that person's arrest record.
The Hawaii supreme court held that "[ajpplying rules of
statutory interpretation, we hold that under the plain language
of HRS §§ 831-3.2 (a) and 701-107(7), a person arrested for or
charged with a crime (including a petty misdemeanor), but
convicted of a violation, is eligible for arrest record
expungement because a 'violation' is not a 'crime'".
The presence of an arrest on an individual's record may
interfere with the individual's ability to receive housing,
employment, or other opportunities. The expungement of that
record is an appropriate action when the arrest led to a
conviction for a "violation", which is not considered a "crime".
2026-3379 HB2279 GDI HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.

S.D. 1
C.D. 1
The purpose of this Act is to amend the expungement orders
law to clarify that a person who is arrested for or charged with
a crime but convicted of a violation is eligible for expungement
of their arrest record for that incident.
SECTION 2. Section 831-3.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) The attorney general, or the attorney general's duly
authorized representative within the department of the attorney
general, upon written application from a person arrested for, or
charged with but not convicted of a crime, arrested for or
charged with a crime but convicted of a violation, or found
eligible for redress under chapter 661B, shall issue an
expungement order annulling, canceling, and rescinding the
record of arrest; provided that an expungement order shall not
be issued:
(1) In the case of an arrest for a felony or misdemeanor
where conviction has not been obtained because of bail
forfeiture;
(2) For a period of five years after arrest or citation in
the case of a petty misdemeanor or violation where
2026-3379 HB2279 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
conviction has not been obtained because of a bail
forfeiture;
(3) In the case of an arrest of any person for any offense
where conviction has not been obtained because the
S person has rendered prosecution impossible by
absenting oneself from the jurisdiction;
(4) In the case of a person who was involuntarily
hospitalized pursuant to section 706-607, or who was
acquitted or had charges dismissed pursuant to chapter
704 due to a physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect; and
(5) For a period of one year upon discharge of the
defendant and dismissal of the charge against the
defendant in the case of a deferred acceptance of
guilty plea or nolo contendere plea, in accordance
with chapter 853.
Any person entitled to an expungement order under this
section may by written application also request return of all
fingerprints or photographs taken in connection with the
person's arrest. The attorney general or the attorney general's
duly authorized representative within the department of the
2026-3379 HB2279 CDl HMSO 3
IIIHIinillllllllllllHHII

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
attorney general, within one hundred twenty days after receipt
of the written application, shall, when requested, deliver, or
cause to be delivered, all fingerprints or photographs of the
person, unless the person has a record of conviction or is a
fugitive from justice, in which case the photographs or
fingerprints may be retained by the agencies holding the
records."
2. By amending subsection (g) to read:
"(g) The meaning of the following terms as used in this
section shall be as indicated:
"Arrest record" means any existing photographic and
fingerprint cards relating to the arrest.
"Conviction" means a final determination of guilt_^ whether
by plea of the accused in open court, by verdict of the jury_^ or
by decision of the court.
"Crime" means a felony, misdemeanor, or petty misdemeanor
as specified in section 701-107.
"Violation" means an offense that does not constitute a
crime as specified in section 701-107."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-3379 HB2279 CDl HMSO 4

Page 5 2279
H.B. NO
H.D, 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3379 HB2279 CDl HMSO


2279
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2279, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2279, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
67-26